Washington statutes.
RCW 19.108.050

Court orders to preserve secrecy of alleged trade secrets.

In an action under this chapter, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera hearings, sealing the records of the action, and ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

[ 1981 c 286 s 5.]